Florida, session 2026, HB581.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (m) is added to subsection (10) of
section 768.28, Florida Statutes, to read:
768.28 Waiver of sovereign immunity in tort actions;
recovery limits; civil liability for damages caused during a
riot; limitation on attorney fees; statute of limitations;
exclusions; indemnification; risk management programs.—
(10)
(m) For purposes of this section, a contractor providing
public transit services under a contract with the state or any
of its agencies or subdivisions, or any employee, agent, or
subcontractor of such contractor, is considered an agent of the
state while acting within the scope of and pursuant to
guidelines established in said contract or by rule. The term
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb581-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 581 2026
"public transit" has the same meaning as in s. 341.031(1).
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb581-00